test/src/morphology/cs-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/cs.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  CS: #
    että+CS: että # 
    jotta+CS: jotta # 
    koska+CS: koska # 
    kun+CS: kun # 
    jos+CS: jos # 
    vaikka+CS: vaikka # 
